Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 2. Meetings and Action of the Board

§ 8.20.
Meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings, as defined in subdivision 1.40(26) of this title, in or outside this State.

The board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication, including an electronic, telecommunications, and video- or audio-conferencing conference telephone call, by which all directors participating may simultaneously or sequentially communicate with each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 93;

2011, No. 52

, § 18, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 8.21.
Action without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws preclude the taking of action required or permitted by this title without a meeting of the board of directors, action required or permitted by this title to be taken at a board of directors’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the board. Each action must be evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director, and included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section is effective when the last director signs the consent, unless the consent specifies a different effective date.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.22.
Notice of meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors must be preceded by at least two business days’ notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.23.
Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the director’s arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.24.
Quorum and voting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number, a quorum of a board of directors consists of:

a majority of the fixed number of directors if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

a majority of the number of directors prescribed, or if no number is prescribed the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if the corporation has a variable-range size board.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless:

the director objects at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the director’s arrival) to holding it or transacting business at the meeting;

the director’s dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

the director delivers written notice of the director’s dissent or abstension to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.25.
Committees.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint members of the board of directors to serve on them. Each committee must have two or more members, who serve at the pleasure of the board of directors.

The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it must be approved by the greater of:

a majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

the number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws to take action under section 8.24 of this title.

Sections 8.20 through 8.24 of this title, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board of directors, apply to committees and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each committee may exercise the authority of the board of directors under section 8.01 of this title.

A committee may not, however:

authorize distributions;

approve or propose to shareholders action that this title requires be approved by shareholders;

fill vacancies on the board of directors or on any of its committees;

amend articles of incorporation pursuant to section 10.02 of this title;

adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws;

approve a plan of merger not requiring shareholder approval;

authorize or approve reacquisition of shares, except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors; or

authorize or approve the issuance or sale or contract for sale of shares, or determine the designation and relative rights, preferences, and limitations of a class or series of shares, except that the board of directors may authorize a committee (or a senior executive officer of the corporation) to do so within limits specifically prescribed by the board of directors.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in section 8.30 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.